Utah statutes.
67-1a-2.5.   Fees of lieutenant governor.

In addition to the fees prescribed by Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, the lieutenant governor shall receive and determine fees pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for the following:

(1)  for a copy of any law, resolution, record, or other document or paper on file in the lieutenant governor's office, other than documents or papers filed under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act;

(2)  for affixing certificate and the Great Seal of the state, except on documents filed under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act;

(3)  for each commission signed by the governor, except that no charge may be made for commissions to public officers serving without compensation;

(4)  for each warrant of arrest issued by the governor and attested by the lieutenant governor upon the requisition of any other state or territory;

(5)  for recording miscellaneous papers or documents;

(6)  for filing any paper or document not otherwise provided for; and

(7)  for searching records and archives of the state, except that no member of the Legislature or other state or county officer may be charged for any search relative to matters appertaining to the duties of the member or officer's office or for a certified copy of any law or resolution relative to the member or officer's official duties passed by the Legislature.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

